Washington statutes.
RCW 19.72.141

Suretyship—Order to exhaust principal's property.

If the finding upon such issue be in favor of the surety, the court shall make an order directing the sheriff to levy the execution upon, and first exhaust the property of the principal before a levy shall be made upon the property of the surety, and the clerk shall indorse a memorandum of the order upon the execution.

[Code 1881 s 647; RRS s 977. Prior: 1877 p 134 s 650; 1869 p 151 s 587; 1854 p 211 s 429. Formerly RCW 19.72.140, part.]